Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2131YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 245 Section 1. Section 53.11, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) The site requested is on school 3 property and a question to approve a bond, an instructional 4 support program, an educational improvement program, a physical 5 plant and equipment levy, or public education and recreation 6 levy issued by any school appears on the ballot to be voted at 7 that election. 8